Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 24. State Water Commission.

§ 30-186.
State Water Commission; membership; terms; compensation and expenses; staff; quorum; voting on recommendations.

The State Water Commission (the Commission) is established in the legislative branch of state government. The Commission shall consist of 15 members to be appointed as follows: the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources; seven members of the House of Delegates appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates; four members of the Senate appointed by the Committee on Rules; and two nonlegislative citizen members to be appointed by the Governor, who shall be citizens of the Commonwealth.

Legislative members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office and may be reappointed to successive terms. Gubernatorial appointees shall serve for terms of four years and may succeed themselves, but vacancies during their terms shall be filled only for the unexpired portion of the term. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The members of the Commission shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman.

Commission members shall be compensated as provided in § 30-19.12, and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Commission from existing appropriations to the Commission.

Administrative staff support shall be provided by the Office of the Clerk of the Senate or the Office of the Clerk of the House of Delegates as may be appropriate for the house in which the chairman of the Commission serves. The Division of Legislative Services shall provide legal, research, policy analysis and other services as requested by the Commission. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall assist the Commission upon request.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of members so request.

No recommendation of the Commission shall be adopted if a majority of the Senate members or a majority of House members appointed to the Commission (i) vote against the recommendation and (ii) vote for the recommendation to fail notwithstanding the majority vote of the Commission.

History.

1990, c. 122, §§ 9-145.9, 9-145.10; 2001, c. 844; 2004, c. 1000.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 rewrote the section.

§ 30-187.
Powers and duties of the Commission.

The Commission shall have the power and duty to:

Study all aspects of water supply and allocation problems in the Commonwealth, whether these problems are of a quantitative or qualitative nature;

Coordinate the legislative recommendations of all other state entities having responsibilities with respect to water supply and allocation issues; and

Report annually its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor. The chairman of the Commission shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of the Commission no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

1990, c. 122, § 9-145.8; 2001, c. 844; 2004, c. 1000.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 rewrote subdivision 3.